Hawaii, session 2025, SB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Daniel K. Inouye International Airport is the only port of entry for all dogs and cats entering Hawaii unless a valid neighbor island inspection permit has been issued by the Hawaii department of agriculture.  This requirement encompasses all dogs and cats, including service animals.  The legislature further finds that because the airport animal quarantine holding facility is located on Oahu, the animal inspection fee for service animals is waived for those who arrive at the Daniel K. Inouye International Airport.  Residents and visitors who arrive at any other port of entry in the State with a service animal are burdened with having to pay the inspection permit fee. The purpose of this Act is to provide equality and fairness to all persons with disabilities traveling with a service animal by requiring the department of agriculture to be responsible for all neighbor island inspection fees for service animals located in the State and being transported for release at Ellison Onizuka Kona International Airport at Keahole, Kahului Airport, or Lihue Airport. SECTION 2. Chapter 142, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§142-    Service animals; interisland quarantine; permit fees.  The department of agriculture shall be responsible for all neighbor island inspection permit fees for a service animal, as defined in section 347-2.5, that is located in the State and is being transported for release at Ellison Onizuka Kona International Airport, Kahului Airport, or Lihue Airport." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to cover the costs of implementing section 142-  , Hawaii Revised Statutes, pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________